Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1679YC (5) 91 nls/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 514C.3D State-regulated dental care 1 service plans. 2 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 3 provides: 4 a. âCommissionerâ means the commissioner of insurance. 5 b. âCovered personâ means the same as defined in section 6 514C.3C. 7 c. âDental care providerâ means the same as defined in 8 section 514C.3C. 9 d. âDental care service planâ means the same as defined in 10 section 514C.3C. 11 e. âDental carrierâ means the same as defined in section 12 514C.3C. 13 2. If a covered personâs dental care service plan is subject 14 to the insurance laws and regulations of this state, or subject 15 to the jurisdiction of the commissioner, a dental carrier shall 16 do all of the following: 17 a. Disclose to a dental care provider through an online 18 dental care provider portal, or other easily accessible 19 means, that a covered personâs dental care service plan is 20 state-regulated. 21 b. Include the statement âstate-regulatedâ on an electronic 22 or physical identification card issued to a covered person on 23 or after July 1, 2025. 24